Maryland, session 2025, HB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–2302.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ENTITY COVERED BY A SALT
MANAGEMENT PLAN UNDER A FEDERAL PERMIT.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT STORE ROAD SALT UNCOVERED OUTDOORS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH:
(1) PROPER OUTDOOR STORAGE REQUIREMENTS FOR ROAD SALT;
AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1360*

HOUSE BILL 1360
(2) PENALTIES AND REMEDIATION REQUIREMENTS FOR FAILURE TO
COMPLY WITH THE REGULATIONS.
(D) A PERSON WHO STORES ROAD SALT OUTDOORS SHALL ENSURE THE
STORAGE IS COMPLIANT WITH THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) A COUNTY STORMWATER MANAGEMENT AUTHORITY IN COORDINATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER, PREEMPT,
OR OTHERWISE RELIEVE LIABILITY FOR THE DISCHARGE OF ROAD SALT INTO
WATERS OF THE STATE OR THE STATE’S ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY UNDER THE
FEDERAL CLEAN WATER ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.